Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 15 Animals at Large

4-15-1.
Municipal pounds.

Every town or city may maintain at its own charge one or more public pounds, for the impounding of horses, mules, neat-cattle, sheep, goats, geese, hogs, and asses and for the securing of those animals agreeable to law in some convenient place or places in that town or city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 127, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 153, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 183, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 643, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3001, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-1

.

4-15-2.
Appointment of field drivers.

The town and city councils of the several towns and cities may appoint one or more field drivers for their cities and towns, with the same power to impound animals as the freeholders and qualified voters of the cities and towns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-2

.

4-15-3.
Impoundment of animals at large on highways.

If any horse, neat-beast, sheep, or hog is going at large in any highway or common, or on any land thrown open as a way for public travel and used by the public for travel, any freeholder or qualified elector or field driver may, and every surveyor of highways of the town within which that animal is at large shall, take up the animal and impound it in one of the public pounds of that city or town, and every surveyor of highways of the city or town may appoint in writing a deputy or deputies for that purpose, filing in the office of the city or town clerk a copy of that appointment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-3

.

4-15-4.
Grazing animals deemed at large.

Every horse, neat-beast, sheep, or hog which feeds or grazes upon any highway or common, or on any land thrown open as a way for public travel and used by the public for travel, is deemed to be going at large.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-4

.

4-15-5.
Animals in private ways in Newport.

Horses, neat-cattle, sheep, and hogs are deemed to be at large within the meaning of this chapter within the limits of any private way in the city of Newport, without the consent of the owners of the fee in that private way, and that private way, for the purpose of authorizing the taking up and impounding of those animals, is deemed a common within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-5

.

4-15-6.
Care of impounded animals.

The keeper of any pound in which any animal is impounded shall receive, keep, and feed the animal in that pound and he or she shall and may milk any impounded cow for his or her own use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-6

.

4-15-7.
Fees paid to poundkeeper.

The owner of any impounded animal shall not take the animal out of the pound until he or she first pays to the poundkeeper, the expenses of keeping that animal, no regard being had to the milk derived from the animal, and the fees of the poundkeeper for receiving the animal into the pound, namely: for each horse and neat-beast, not more than five dollars ($5.00); for each sheep and hog, not more than three dollars ($3.00); for every notification set up, or notice given to the owner, not more than one dollar ($1.00); and the following penalties, namely: for every horse, neat-beast, hog, and sheep, not more than two dollars ($2.00) as by ordinance provided by each town or city.

The Richmond town council is authorized to enact ordinances:

Prohibiting the owner or custodian of any animal including, but not limited to, horses, cattle, goats, sheep, swine, emus, llamas, alpacas, rabbits, poultry, ducks, geese, guinea fowl, pea fowl, peacocks, ostriches, reptiles, and birds, to allow that animal to be at large;

Authorizing the animal control officer or any police officer to seize and impound any animal found off the property of its owner or custodian;

Imposing the penalties prescribed by

4-13-1(b)(12)

for allowing any animal to be at large; and

Permitting the animal control officer or any police officer to issue citations for violations and to provide for payment of fines by mail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3571, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-7

; P.L. 2011, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 142, § 2.

4-15-8.
Disposition of penalties.

The poundkeeper shall pay one half (1/2) of every sum received by him or her as a penalty, in pursuance of §

4-15-7

, to the city or town treasurer of the city or town in which the pound is situated, and one half (1/2) to the person who impounded the animal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-8

.

4-15-9.
Advertising and notice of impoundment.

After any animal has been impounded for forty-eight (48) hours, the poundkeeper shall immediately post up notifications in at least three (3) public places in the city or town with that pound, one of which shall be at or near the office of the city or town clerk of that city or town, describing the natural and artificial marks, if any, on the animal, or shall give notice in writing to the owner of the animal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-9

.

4-15-10.
Delivery of unclaimed animal to city or town treasurer.

If no owner appears within five (5) days from the date of notification, or notice, and pays the penalty and charges, the poundkeeper shall deliver the animal to the city or town treasurer of the city or town, with a statement, in writing, of the time and manner in which the animal was impounded and of the proceedings of that poundkeeper in relation to the animal, together with an account of the charges and expenses due from the owner of the animal to the poundkeeper by virtue of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-10

.

4-15-11.
Sale of unclaimed animals — Disposition of proceeds.

If the city or town treasurer finds the proceedings of the poundkeeper correct, he or she shall sell the animal at public auction, after giving reasonable notice of the sale, and shall, out of the proceeds of the sale, pay the incidental expenses of the sale, the cost of keeping the animal after the animal was delivered to him or her by the poundkeeper for sale, the expenses, charges and penalty, and in the order provided in this chapter, if the proceeds of the sale are not sufficient to pay all the expenses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-11

.

4-15-12.
Conveyances found with impounded animals.

If any horse or other animal, attached to any vehicle, sledge, or sleigh, is found at large, abandoned, or with no person in charge of the animal, upon any highway or common, or on any land thrown open as a way for public travel and used by the public for travel, any person authorized under this chapter to impound animals going at large, may impound the vehicle, sledge, or sleigh, together with the vehicle, sledge or sleigh attached and the harness and other property, in one of the public pounds of that city or town. The animal shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, and the vehicle, sledge or sleigh, harness and other property, shall be held, surrendered or, after thirty (30) days’ notice by the town or city treasurer, sold, under the same liabilities, powers, provisions, and restrictions prescribed in this chapter relating to horses and other animals impounded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-12

.

4-15-13.
Application of chapter to goats and geese.

If any city or town votes to extend the provisions of this chapter to goats and to geese going at large within its limits, those goats and geese shall subject their owner to the same obligations and duties and shall themselves be disposed of in the same way as is in this chapter provided in relation to the animals named in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-13

.

4-15-14.
Fees and penalties for goats and geese.

The fees of the poundkeeper for receiving goats shall be four cents (4¢) each, and for receiving geese two cents (2¢) each, and the penalty shall be twenty cents (20¢) for each goat and five cents (5¢) for each goose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 128, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 154, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 184, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 641, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-15-14

.

4-15-15.
Veterinarian’s emergency treatment of animals — Immunity from liability.

Any licensed veterinarian of this state has the right to treat any animal which has become injured upon any public highway of this state or upon any public or private property of this state which is transported to that veterinarian by any person.

If in the veterinarian’s opinion the injuries sustained by the animal will result in death, the veterinarian has the right to apply euthanasia to eliminate any unnecessary suffering.

If, at the conclusion of a seventy-two (72) hour period the legal owner of the animal has not been identified or presented himself or herself to the veterinarian, the veterinarian has the right to return the animal to the animal control warden or dog officer of the community where the animal was injured for disposition. The animal warden or dog officer shall have the right to dispose of the animal in accordance with the ordinances set forth by the community.

The veterinarian, animal control officer, or dog officer, or any person shall not be held liable for any actions taken by them in the treatment or care of the animal by the owner should the owner become known and the owner shall then be responsible for any fees reasonably incurred in the treatment and care of the animal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 81, § 1.

4-15-16.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 8.